Mississippi, session 2026, SB3400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Dennis Hopkins of Marshall County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector on March 6, 1998, as a result of his convictions in Union County for two (2) counts of grand larceny.  On March 6, 1998, he was sentenced to serve two (2) four-year, concurrent terms in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. In a related matter to the larceny convictions, he was convicted of the crime of burglary in Marshall County.  On May 19, 1998, he was sentenced to serve a four-year term in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was placed on intensive supervision on October 28, 1999. Hopkins was discharged from the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections on April 30, 2001, due to the expiration of his sentence.  He completed all terms and conditions of his sentence. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.